Maryland, session 2026, HB0154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–107.
(b) A county board may hold any other meetings that its duties and business
require.
(c) Except as provided in Title 3 of this article, each county board, at its annual
meeting, shall elect a president and a vice president from among its members by means of
an individually recorded vote.
(d) (1) (I) All final actions of a county board shall be taken at a public
meeting.
(II) The AGENDA, minutes of [the] A meeting, AND LIVE VIDEO
STREAMING OF EACH PORTION OF A MEETING HELD IN OPEN SESSION shall be
PUBLICLY available [to the public] ON THE COUNTY BOARD’S WEBSITE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–307 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(2) A county board may meet and deliberate in executive session if the
matter under consideration is:
(i) Land and site acquisitions; or
(ii) Personnel and labor relations.
Article – General Provisions
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Public body” means an entity that:
(i) consists of at least two individuals; and
(ii) is created by:

HOUSE BILL 154 3
1. the Maryland Constitution;
2. a State statute;
3. a county or municipal charter;
4. a memorandum of understanding or a master agreement
to which a majority of the county boards of education and the State Department of
Education are signatories;
5. an ordinance;
6. a rule, resolution, or bylaw;
7. an executive order of the Governor; or
8. an executive order of the chief executive authority of a
political subdivision of the State.
3–105.
Whenever this title and another law that relates to meetings of public bodies conflict,
this title applies unless the other law is more stringent.
3–307.
(a) This section applies only to the following public bodies:
(1) the Board of Directors of the Bainbridge Development Corporation;
(2) the Canal Place Preservation and Development Authority;
(3) the Maryland 9–1–1 Board;
(4) the Board of Directors of the Maryland Agricultural and
Resource–Based Industry Corporation;
(5) the Board of Directors of the Maryland Clean Energy Center;
(6) the Board of Directors of the Maryland Economic Development
Corporation;
(7) the Board of Directors of the Maryland Environmental Service;
(8) the Maryland Food Center Authority;

HOUSE BILL 154
(9) the Maryland Health and Higher Educational Facilities Authority;
(10) the Maryland Industrial Development Financing Authority;
(11) the Maryland Stadium Authority;
(12) the Maryland Transportation Authority;
(13) the Northeast Maryland Waste Disposal Authority;
(14) the Public Service Commission;
(15) the State Board of Elections;
(16) the Maryland Technology Development Corporation;
(17) the Historic St. Mary’s City Commission;
(18) the State Ethics Commission;
(19) the Maryland Aviation Commission; [and]
(20) the Maryland Department of Transportation, with respect to quarterly
public meetings held by the Vision Zero coordinator on the implementation of Vision Zero
under § 8–1004 of the Transportation Article; AND
(21) A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE BALTIMORE CITY
BOARD OF SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS.
(b) A public body specified in subsection (a) of this section shall make publicly
available on its website:
(1) each open meeting agenda, together with a summary of any finalized
documents, written testimony from the public, and other materials that the public body
will vote on at the open meeting:
(i) at least 48 hours in advance of each meeting; or
(ii) if the meeting is being held due to an emergency, a natural
disaster, or any other unanticipated situation, as far in advance of the meeting as
practicable;
(2) meeting minutes from the portions of a meeting that were held in open
session, not more than 2 business days after the minutes are approved; and

HOUSE BILL 154 5
(3) subject to subsections (f), [and] (g), AND (I) of this section, live video
streaming of each portion of a meeting that is held in open session.
(c) To the extent practicable, each open meeting agenda shall indicate:
(1) whether the public body intends to adjourn the open session to a closed
session; and
(2) if applicable, the expected time at which the public body intends to
adjourn the open session to a closed session.
(d) (1) The public body shall approve meeting minutes in a timely manner.
(2) Each open meeting agenda shall include consideration of the meeting
minutes from the most recent meeting.
(3) The requirement under paragraph (2) of this subsection does not apply
to the agenda of an emergency meeting of a public body if consideration of the meeting
minutes from the most recent meeting is not practicable because of the need to hold an
emergency meeting.
(e) The public body shall maintain on its website:
(1) meeting minutes made available under subsection (b) of this section for
a minimum of 5 years after the date of the meeting; and
(2) except as provided in subsections (f), (g), (H), and [(g–1)] (I) of this
section, a complete and unedited archived video recording of each open meeting for which
live video streaming was made available under subsection (b) of this section for a minimum
of 1 year after the date of the meeting.
(f) (1) This subsection applies only to the Maryland Stadium Authority.
(2) If the Maryland Stadium Authority meets by telephone conference, the
Authority shall:
(i) make publicly available on its website live audio streaming of
each portion of the meeting that is held in open session; and
(ii) maintain on its website a complete and unedited archived audio
recording of each meeting for which live audio streaming was made available for a
minimum of 1 year after the date of the meeting.
(g) (1) This subsection applies only to the Maryland Transportation Authority.
(2) The Maryland Transportation Authority is required to provide live
video streaming of a meeting only if the meeting is held at:

HOUSE BILL 154
(i) the headquarters of the Maryland Transportation Authority; or
(ii) a location where the Maryland Transportation Authority held at
least 10 meetings during the immediately preceding calendar year.
[(g–1)] (H) The Maryland Department of Transportation, with respect to quarterly
public meetings held by the Vision Zero coordinator on the implementation of Vision Zero
under § 8–1004 of the Transportation Article, shall maintain on its website a complete and
unedited archived video recording of the meeting for a minimum of 5 years after the date
of the meeting.
(I) (1) A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE BALTIMORE CITY
BOARD OF SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS SHALL PROVIDE LIVE VIDEO STREAMING OF
AN OPEN MEETING IF THE MEETING IS HELD AT:
(I) THE HEADQUARTERS OF A COUNTY BOARD OR THE
BALTIMORE CITY BOARD OF SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS; OR
(II) A LOCATION WHERE A COUNTY BOARD OR THE BALTIMORE
CITY BOARD OF SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS HELD AT LEAST FIVE MEETINGS DURING
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) (I) A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE BALTIMORE
CITY BOARD OF SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS SHALL MAINTAIN ON ITS WEBSITE A
COMPLETE AND UNEDITED AN ARCHIVED VIDEO RECORDING OF EACH OPEN
MEETING FOR WHICH LIVE VIDEO STREAMING WAS MADE AVAILABLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FOR A MINIMUM OF 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF
THE MEETING.
(II) A COUNTY BOARD AND THE BALTIMORE CITY BOARD OF
SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS MAY EDIT AN ARCHIVED VIDEO RECORDING THAT IS
REQUIRED TO BE MAINTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION TO REMOVE CONTENT FROM
THE RECORDING THAT INVOLVES:
1. A PORNOGRAPHIC OR OBSCENE EVENT; OR
2. AN INSTANCE WHEN A STUDENT’S PRIVACY IS
VIOLATED.
(III) IF A COUNTY BOARD OR THE BALTIMORE CITY BOARD OF
SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS EDITS A RECORDING UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE COUNTY BOARD OR THE BALTIMORE CITY BOARD OF SCHOOL
COMMISSIONERS SHALL NOTIFY THE OPEN MEETINGS LAW COMPLIANCE BOARD.

HOUSE BILL 154 7
(3) A COUNTY BOARD OR THE BALTIMORE CITY BOARD OF SCHOOL
COMMISSIONERS MAY USE A THIRD–PARTY PROVIDER TO VIEW AND STORE
RECORDED VIDEO FOOTAGE.
[(h)] (J) The Department of Information Technology shall provide the technical
staff, support, and equipment necessary to livestream the open meetings of:
(1) the Maryland Transportation Authority;
(2) the State Board of Elections; and
(3) the State Ethics Commission.
[(i)] (K) For purposes of this title, a project site visit or educational field tour
may not be considered a meeting of a public body listed under subsection (a) of this section
if no organizational business is conducted.
[(j)] (L) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a public body from
altering the agenda of a meeting after the agenda has been made available to the public.
[(k)] (M) The requirements of this section are in addition to the other
requirements of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.